North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 5. Procedures for Admission and Discharge of Clients.
§ 122C-271.
Disposition.

If a commitment examiner has recommended outpatient commitment and the respondent has been released pending the district court hearing, the court may make one of the following dispositions:

If the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent has a mental illness; that the respondent is capable of surviving safely in the community with available supervision from family, friends, or others; that based on respondent’s treatment history, the respondent is in need of treatment in order to prevent further disability or deterioration that would predictably result in dangerousness as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

; and that the respondent’s current mental status or the nature of the respondent’s illness limits or negates the respondent’s ability to make an informed decision to seek voluntarily or comply with recommended treatment, it may order outpatient commitment for a period not in excess of 90 days.

If the court does not find that the respondent meets the criteria of commitment set out in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the respondent shall be discharged and the proposed outpatient physician center shall be so notified.

Before ordering any outpatient commitment under this subsection, the court shall make findings of fact as to the availability of outpatient treatment from an outpatient treatment physician or center that has agreed to accept the respondent as a client of outpatient treatment services. The court shall show on the order the outpatient treatment physician or center that is to be responsible for the management and supervision of the respondent’s outpatient commitment. If the designated outpatient treatment physician or center will be monitoring and supervising the respondent’s outpatient commitment pursuant to a contract for services with an LME/MCO, the court shall show on the order the identity of the LME/MCO. The clerk of court shall send a copy of the outpatient commitment order to the designated outpatient treatment physician or center and to the respondent client or the legally responsible person. The clerk of court shall also send a copy of the order to that LME/MCO. Copies of outpatient commitment orders sent by the clerk of court to an outpatient treatment center or physician under this section, including orders sent to an LME/MCO, shall be sent by the most reliable and expeditious means, but in no event less than 48 hours after the hearing.

If the respondent has been held in a 24-hour facility pending the district court hearing pursuant to

G.S. 122C-268

, the court may make one of the following dispositions:

If the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent has a mental illness; that the respondent is capable of surviving safely in the community with available supervision from family, friends, or others; that based on respondent’s psychiatric history, the respondent is in need of treatment in order to prevent further disability or deterioration that would predictably result in dangerousness as defined by

G.S. 122C-3(11)

; and that the respondent’s current mental status or the nature of the respondent’s illness limits or negates the respondent’s ability to make an informed decision voluntarily to seek or comply with recommended treatment, it may order outpatient commitment for a period not in excess of 90 days. If the commitment proceedings were initiated as the result of the respondent’s being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and the respondent was found incapable of proceeding, the commitment order shall so show.

If the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent has a mental illness and is dangerous to self, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

a., or others, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(11)b., it may order inpatient commitment at a 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

for a period not in excess of 90 days. However, no respondent found to have both an intellectual disability and a mental illness may be committed to a State, area, or private facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities. An individual who has a mental illness and is dangerous to self, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(11)a., or others, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(11)b., may also be committed to a combination of inpatient and outpatient commitment at both a 24-hour facility and an outpatient treatment physician or center for a period not in excess of 90 days. If the commitment proceedings were initiated as the result of the respondent’s being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and the respondent was found incapable of proceeding, the commitment order shall so show. If the court orders inpatient commitment for a respondent who is under an outpatient commitment order, the outpatient commitment is terminated; and the clerk of the superior court of the county where the district court hearing is held shall send a notice of the inpatient commitment to the clerk of superior court where the outpatient commitment was being supervised.

If the court does not find that the respondent meets either of the commitment criteria set out in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, the respondent shall be discharged, and the facility in which the respondent was last a client shall be so notified.

Before ordering any outpatient commitment, the court shall make findings of fact as to the availability of outpatient treatment from an outpatient treatment physician or center that has agreed to accept the respondent as a client of outpatient treatment services. The court shall also show on the order the outpatient treatment physician or center who is to be responsible for the management and supervision of the respondent’s outpatient commitment. When an outpatient commitment order is issued for a respondent held in a 24-hour facility, the court may order the respondent held at the facility for no more than 72 hours in order for the facility to notify the designated outpatient treatment physician or center of the treatment needs of the respondent. The clerk of court in the county where the facility is located shall send a copy of the outpatient commitment order to the designated outpatient treatment physician or center and to the respondent or the legally responsible person. If the designated outpatient treatment physician or center shall be monitoring and supervising the respondent’s outpatient commitment pursuant to a contract for services with an LME/MCO, the clerk of court shall show on the order the identity of the LME/MCO. The clerk of court shall send a copy of the order to the LME/MCO. Copies of outpatient commitment orders sent by the clerk of court to an outpatient treatment center or physician pursuant to this subdivision, including orders sent to an LME/MCO, shall be sent by the most reliable and expeditious means, but in no event less than 48 hours after the hearing. If the outpatient commitment will be supervised in a county other than the county where the commitment originated, the court shall order venue for further court proceedings to be transferred to the county where the outpatient commitment will be supervised. Upon an order changing venue, the clerk of superior court in the county where the commitment originated shall transfer the file to the clerk of superior court in the county where the outpatient commitment is to be supervised.

If the respondent was found not guilty by reason of insanity and has been held in a 24-hour facility pending the court hearing held pursuant to

G.S. 122C-268.1

, the court may make one of the following dispositions:

If the court finds that the respondent has not proved by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent no longer has a mental illness or that the respondent is no longer dangerous to others, it shall order inpatient treatment at a 24-hour facility for a period not to exceed 90 days.

If the court finds that the respondent has proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent no longer has a mental illness or that the respondent is no longer dangerous to others, the court shall order the respondent discharged and released.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 8; c. 739, s. 2; 1979, c. 358, s. 26; c. 915, ss. 8, 15, 16; 1981, c. 537, s. 1; 1983, c. 380, s. 8; c. 638, s. 14; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, ss. 20-22; 1989, c. 225, s. 1; c. 770, s. 73; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 823, s. 8; 1991, c. 37, s. 13; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1034, s. 5; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 13; 2018-33, s. 30; 2019-76, s. 10.

§ 122C-272.
Appeal.

Judgment of the district court is final. Appeal may be had to the Court of Appeals by the State or by any party on the record as in civil cases. Appeal does not stay the commitment unless so ordered by the Court of Appeals. The Attorney General represents the State’s interest on appeal. The district court retains limited jurisdiction for the purpose of hearing all reviews, rehearings, or supplemental hearings allowed or required under this Part.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1979, c. 915, s. 19; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2009-570, s. 27.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-570, s. 27, effective August 28, 2009, substituted “Judgment” for “Judgement” at the beginning of the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 law on civil procedure, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1049 (1981).

§ 122C-273.
Duties for follow-up on commitment order.

Unless prohibited by Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, if the commitment order directs outpatient treatment, the outpatient treatment physician may prescribe or administer, or the center may administer, to the respondent reasonable and appropriate medication and treatment that are consistent with accepted medical standards.

If the respondent fails to comply or clearly refuses to comply with all or part of the prescribed treatment, the physician, the physician’s designee, or the center shall make all reasonable effort to solicit the respondent’s compliance. These efforts shall be documented and reported to the court with a request for a supplemental hearing.

If the respondent fails to comply, but does not clearly refuse to comply, with all or part of the prescribed treatment after reasonable effort to solicit the respondent’s compliance, the physician, the physician’s designee, or the center may request the court to order the respondent taken into custody for the purpose of examination. Upon receipt of this request, the clerk shall issue an order to a law-enforcement officer to take the respondent into custody and to take him immediately to the designated outpatient treatment physician or center for examination. The custody order is valid throughout the State. The law-enforcement officer shall turn the respondent over to the custody of the physician or center who shall conduct the examination and then release the respondent. The law-enforcement officer may wait during the examination and return the respondent to his home after the examination. An examination conducted under this subsection in which a physician or eligible psychologist determines that the respondent meets the criteria for inpatient commitment may be substituted for the first examination required by

G.S. 122C-263

if the clerk or magistrate issues a custody order within six hours after the examination was performed.

In no case may the respondent be physically forced to take medication or forcibly detained for treatment unless he poses an immediate danger to himself or others. In such cases inpatient commitment proceedings shall be initiated.

At any time that the outpatient treatment physician or center finds that the respondent no longer meets the criteria set out in

G.S. 122C-263

(d)(1), the physician or center shall so notify the court and the case shall be terminated; provided, however, if the respondent was initially committed as a result of conduct resulting in his being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and the respondent was found incapable of proceeding, the designated outpatient treatment physician or center shall notify the clerk that discharge is recommended. The clerk shall calendar a supplemental hearing as provided in

G.S. 122C-274

to determine whether the respondent meets the criteria for outpatient commitment.

Any individual who has knowledge that a respondent on outpatient commitment has become dangerous to himself, as defined by

G.S. 122C-3(11)

a., and others, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b., may initiate a new petition for inpatient commitment as provided in this Part. If the respondent is committed as an inpatient, the outpatient commitment shall be terminated and notice sent by the clerk of court in the county where the respondent is committed as an inpatient to the clerk of court of the county where the outpatient commitment is being supervised.

If the respondent on outpatient commitment intends to move or moves to another county within the State, the designated outpatient treatment physician or center shall request that the clerk of court in the county where the outpatient commitment is being supervised calendar a supplemental hearing.

If the respondent moves to another state or to an unknown location, the designated outpatient treatment physician or center shall notify the clerk of superior court of the county where the outpatient commitment is supervised and the outpatient commitment shall be terminated.

If the commitment order directs inpatient treatment, the physician attending the respondent may administer to the respondent reasonable and appropriate medication and treatment that are consistent with accepted medical standards. The attending physician shall release or discharge the respondent in accordance with

G.S. 122C-277

.

History.

1983, c. 638, s. 16; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, ss. 23-26; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 823, s. 9; 1991, c. 37, s. 14; 2004-23, s. 2(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-23, s. 2(b), effective June 25, 2004, inserted the third sentence in subdivision (a)(2).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Civil Commitment of Minors: Due and Undue Process,” see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1133 (1980).

§ 122C-274.
Supplemental hearings.

Upon receipt of a request for a supplemental hearing, the clerk shall calendar a hearing to be held within 14 days and notify, at least 72 hours before the hearing, the petitioner, the respondent, his attorney, if any, and the designated outpatient treatment physician or center. The respondent shall be notified at least 72 hours before the hearing by personally serving on him an order to appear. Other persons shall be notified as provided in G.S. 122C-264(c).

The procedures for the hearing shall follow

G.S. 122C-267

.

In supplemental hearings for alleged noncompliance, the court shall determine whether the respondent has failed to comply and, if so, the causes for noncompliance. If the court determines that the respondent has failed or refused to comply it may:

Upon finding probable cause to believe that the respondent is mentally ill and dangerous to himself, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

a., or others, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b., order an examination by the same or different physician or eligible psychologist as provided in G.S. 122C-263(c) in order to determine the necessity for continued outpatient or inpatient commitment;

Reissue or change the outpatient commitment order in accordance with

G.S. 122C-271

; or

Discharge the respondent from the order and dismiss the case.

At the supplemental hearing for a respondent who has moved or intends to move to another county, the court shall determine if the respondent meets the criteria for outpatient commitment set out in G.S. 122C-263(d)(1). If the court determines that the respondent no longer meets the criteria for outpatient commitment, it shall discharge the respondent from the order and dismiss the case. If the court determines that the respondent continues to meet the criteria for outpatient commitment, it shall continue the outpatient commitment but shall designate a physician or center at the respondent’s new residence to be responsible for the management or supervision of the respondent’s outpatient commitment. The court shall order the respondent to appear for treatment at the address of the newly designated outpatient treatment physician or center and shall order venue for further court proceedings under the outpatient commitment to be transferred to the new county of supervision. Upon an order changing venue, the clerk of court in the county where the outpatient commitment has been supervised shall transfer the records regarding the outpatient commitment to the clerk of court in the county where the commitment will be supervised. Also, the clerk of court in the county where the outpatient commitment has been supervised shall send a copy of the court’s order directing the continuation of outpatient treatment under new supervision to the newly designated outpatient treatment physician or center.

At any time during the term of an outpatient commitment order, a respondent may apply to the court for a supplemental hearing for the purpose of discharge from the order. The application shall be made in writing by the respondent to the clerk of superior court of the county where the outpatient commitment is being supervised. At the supplemental hearing the court shall determine whether the respondent continues to meet the criteria specified in G.S. 122C-263(d)(1). The court may either reissue or change the commitment order or discharge the respondent and dismiss the case.

At supplemental hearings requested pursuant to G.S. 122C-277(a) for transfer from inpatient to outpatient commitment, the court shall determine whether the respondent meets the criteria for either inpatient or outpatient commitment. If the court determines that the respondent continues to meet the criteria for inpatient commitment, it shall order the continuation of the original commitment order. If the court determines that the respondent meets the criteria for outpatient commitment, it shall order outpatient commitment for a period of time not in excess of 90 days. If the court finds that the respondent does not meet either criteria, the respondent shall be discharged and the case dismissed.

History.

1983, c. 638, s. 17; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 823, s. 10.

§ 122C-275.
Outpatient commitment; rehearings.

Fifteen days before the end of the initial or subsequent periods of outpatient commitment if the outpatient treatment physician or center determines that the respondent continues to meet the criteria specified in G.S. 122C-263(d)(1), he shall so notify the clerk of superior court of the county where the outpatient commitment is supervised. If the respondent no longer meets the criteria, the physician shall so notify the clerk who shall dismiss the case; provided, however, if the respondent was initially committed as a result of conduct resulting in his being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and the respondent was found incapable of proceeding, the physician or center shall notify the clerk that discharge is recommended. The clerk, at least 10 days before the end of the commitment period, on order of the district court, shall calendar the rehearing.

Notice and procedures of rehearings are governed by the same procedures as initial hearings, and the respondent has the same rights he had at the initial hearing including the right to appeal.

If the court finds that the respondent no longer meets the criteria of G.S. 122C-263(d)(1), it shall unconditionally discharge him. A copy of the discharge order shall be furnished by the clerk to the designated outpatient treatment physician or center. If the respondent continues to meet the criteria of G.S. 122C-263(d)(1), the court may order outpatient commitment for an additional period not in excess of 180 days.

History.

1983, c. 638, s. 20; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1991, c. 37, s. 15.

§ 122C-276.
Inpatient commitment; rehearings for respondents other than insanity acquittees.

Fifteen days before the end of the initial inpatient commitment period if the attending physician determines that commitment of a respondent beyond the initial period will be necessary, he shall so notify the clerk of superior court of the county in which the facility is located. The clerk, at least 10 days before the end of the initial period, on order of a district court judge of the district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

in which the facility is located, shall calendar the rehearing. If the respondent was initially committed as the result of conduct resulting in his being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and respondent was found incapable of proceeding, the clerk shall also notify the chief district court judge, the clerk of superior court, and the district attorney in the county in which the respondent was found incapable of proceeding of the time and place of the hearing.

Fifteen days before the end of the initial treatment period of a respondent who was initially committed as a result of conduct resulting in his being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, having been found incapable of proceeding, if the attending physician determines that commitment of the respondent beyond the initial period will not be necessary, he shall so notify the clerk of superior court who shall schedule a rehearing as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

Subject to the provisions of G.S. 122C-269(c), rehearings shall be held as authorized in G.S. 122C-268(g). The judge is a judge of the district court of the district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

in which the facility is located or a district court judge temporarily assigned to that district.

Notice and proceedings of rehearings are governed by the same procedures as initial hearings and the respondent has the same rights he had at the initial hearing including the right to appeal.

At rehearings the court may make the same dispositions authorized in G.S. 122C-271(b) except a second commitment order may be for an additional period not in excess of 180 days.

Fifteen days before the end of the second commitment period and annually thereafter, the attending physician shall review and evaluate the condition of each respondent; and if he determines that a respondent is in continued need of inpatient commitment or, in the alternative, in need of outpatient commitment, or a combination of both, he shall so notify the respondent, his counsel, and the clerk of superior court of the county, in which the facility is located. Unless the respondent through his counsel files with the clerk a written waiver of his right to a rehearing, the clerk, on order of a district court judge of the district in which the facility is located, shall calendar a rehearing for not later than the end of the current commitment period. The procedures and standards for the rehearing are the same as for the first rehearing. No third or subsequent inpatient recommitment order shall be for a period longer than one year.

At any rehearings the court has the option to order outpatient commitment for a period not in excess of 180 days in accordance with the criteria specified in G.S. 122C-263(d)(1) and following the procedures as specified in this Article.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 9; 1979, c. 915, ss. 9, 17; 1981, c. 537, ss. 2-4; 1983, c. 638, ss. 18, 19; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 116; 1991, c. 37, s. 5; 2018-33, s. 31.

§ 122C-276.1.
Inpatient commitment; rehearings for respondents who are insanity acquittees.

At least 15 days before the end of any inpatient commitment period ordered pursuant to

G.S. 122C-268.1

, the clerk shall calendar the hearing and notify the parties as specified in G.S. 122C-264(d1), unless the hearing is waived by the respondent.

The proceedings of the rehearing shall be governed by the same procedures provided by

G.S. 122C-268.1

.

The respondent shall bear the burden to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that he (i) no longer has a mental illness as defined in G.S. 122C-3(21), or (ii) is no longer dangerous to others as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b. If the court is so satisfied, then the court shall order the respondent discharged and released. If the court finds that the respondent has not met his burden of proof, then the court shall order inpatient commitment be continued for a period not to exceed 180 days. The court shall make a written record of the facts that support its findings.

At least 15 days before the end of any commitment period ordered pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and annually thereafter, the clerk shall calendar the hearing and notify the parties as specified in G.S. 122C-264(d1). The procedures and standards for the rehearing are the same as under this section. No third or subsequent inpatient recommitment order shall be for a period longer than one year.

History.

1991, c. 37, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1034, s. 4.

§ 122C-277.
Release and conditional release; judicial review.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (b1) of this section, the attending physician shall discharge a committed respondent unconditionally at any time he determines that the respondent is no longer in need of inpatient commitment. However, if the attending physician determines that the respondent meets the criteria for outpatient commitment as defined in G.S. 122C-263(d)(1), he may request the clerk to calendar a supplemental hearing to determine whether an outpatient commitment order shall be issued. Except as provided in subsections (b) and (b1) of this section, the attending physician may also release a respondent conditionally for periods not in excess of 30 days on specified medically appropriate conditions. Violation of the conditions is grounds for return of the respondent to the releasing facility. A law-enforcement officer, on request of the attending physician, shall take a conditional releasee into custody and return him to the facility in accordance with

G.S. 122C-205

. Notice of discharge and of conditional release shall be furnished to the clerk of superior court of the county of commitment and of the county in which the facility is located.

If the respondent was initially committed as the result of conduct resulting in his being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and respondent was found incapable of proceeding, 15 days before the respondent’s discharge or conditional release the attending physician shall notify the clerk of superior court of the county in which the facility is located of his determination regarding the proposed discharge or conditional release. The clerk shall then schedule a rehearing to determine the appropriateness of respondent’s release under the standards of commitment set forth in G.S. 122C-271(b). The clerk shall give notice as provided in G.S. 122C-264(d). The district attorney of the district where respondent was found incapable of proceeding may represent the State’s interest at the hearing.

(b1)

If the respondent was initially committed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1321

, 15 days before the respondent’s discharge or conditional release the attending physician shall notify the clerk of superior court. The clerk shall calendar a hearing and shall give notice as provided by G.S. 122C-264(d1). The district attorney for the original trial may represent the State’s interest at the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted under the standards and procedures set forth in

G.S. 122C-268.1

. Provided, that in no event shall discharge or conditional release under this section be allowed for a respondent during the period from automatic commitment to hearing under

G.S. 122C-268.1

.

If a committed respondent under subsections (a), (b), or (b1) of this section is from a single portal area, the attending physician shall plan jointly with the area authority as prescribed in the area plan before discharging or releasing the respondent.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1981, c. 537, s. 5; 1983, c. 383, s. 6; c. 638, s. 21; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1991, c. 37, s. 6.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Psychiatrists’ Liability to Third Parties for Harmful Acts Committed by Dangerous Patients,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1534 (1986).

§ 122C-278.
Reexamination for capacity to proceed prior to discharge.

Whenever a respondent has been committed to either inpatient or outpatient treatment pursuant to this Chapter after having been found incapable of proceeding and referred by the court for civil commitment proceedings, the respondent shall not be discharged from the custody of the hospital or institution or the outpatient commitment case terminated until the respondent has been examined for capacity to proceed and a report filed with the clerk of court pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

.

History.

2013-18, s. 8.

§§ 122C-279,
122C-280.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 8. Involuntary Commitment of Substance Abusers, Facilities for Substance Abusers.

§ 122C-281.
Affidavit and petition before clerk or magistrate; custody order.

Any individual who has knowledge of a substance abuser who is dangerous to self or others may appear before a clerk or assistant or deputy clerk of superior court or a magistrate, execute an affidavit to this effect, and petition the clerk or magistrate for issuance of an order to take the respondent into custody for examination by a commitment examiner. The affidavit shall include the facts on which the affiant’s opinion is based. Jurisdiction under this subsection is in the clerk or magistrate in the county where the respondent resides or is found.

If the clerk or magistrate finds reasonable grounds to believe that the facts alleged in the affidavit are true and that the respondent is probably a substance abuser and dangerous to self or others, the clerk or magistrate shall issue an order to a law enforcement officer or any other person designated under G.S.122C-251(g) to take the respondent into custody for examination by a commitment examiner.

If the clerk or magistrate issues a custody order, the clerk or magistrate shall also make inquiry in any reliable way as to whether the respondent is indigent within the meaning of

G.S. 7A-450

. A magistrate shall report the result of this inquiry to the clerk.

If the affiant is a commitment examiner who has examined the respondent, he or she may execute the affidavit before any official authorized to administer oaths. The commitment examiner is not required to appear before the clerk or magistrate for this purpose. The commitment examiner’s examination shall comply with the requirements of the initial examination as provided in G.S. 122C-283(c). The affiant shall file the affidavit and examination findings with the clerk of court in the manner described in G.S. 122C-261(d)(1). If the commitment examiner recommends commitment and the clerk or magistrate finds probable cause to believe that the respondent meets the criteria for commitment, the clerk or magistrate shall issue an order to a law enforcement officer to take the respondent into custody for transportation to a 24-hour facility, or, if the respondent is released pending hearing, as described in G.S. 122C-283(d)(1), order that a hearing be held as provided in G.S. 122C-284(a). If a physician or eligible psychologist executes an affidavit for commitment of a respondent, a second qualified professional shall perform the examination required by

G.S. 122C-285

. Any person or entity who or which has been designated in compliance with G.S. 122C-251(g) shall be permitted to complete all or part of the duties of a law enforcement officer, in accord with the designation.

Upon receipt of the custody order of the clerk or magistrate, a law enforcement officer or other designated person identified in the order shall take the respondent into custody within 24 hours after the order is signed. The custody order is valid throughout the State.

(e1)

No commitment examiner, area facility, acute care hospital, general hospital, or other site of first examination, or their officials, staff, employees, or other individuals responsible for the custody, examination, detention, management, supervision, treatment, or release of an individual examined for commitment, who is not grossly negligent, shall be held liable in any civil or criminal action for taking measures to temporarily detain an individual for the period of time necessary to complete a commitment examination, submit an affidavit to the magistrate or clerk of court, and await the issuance of a custody order as authorized by subsection (d) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-33, s. 32, effective October 1, 2019.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 3; 1979, c. 164, s. 2; c. 915, ss. 3, 18; 1983, c. 383, s. 5; c. 638, ss. 3-5; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, ss. 2, 4; 2004-23, s. 1(b); 2018-33, s. 32.

Temporary Waiver of Certain Mental Health Commitment Requirements.

Session Laws
2003-178, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws
2006-66, s. 10.27, Session Laws
2007-504, s. 1.1(a), Session Laws
2009-340, s. 3, Session Laws
2010-119, s. 1, and Session Laws
2010-123, s. 4.8, effective July 1, 2003, and expiring October 1, 2012, provides: “The Secretary of Health and Human Services may, upon request of an LME, waive temporarily the requirements of

G.S. 122C-261

through

G.S. 122C-263

and

G.S. 122C-281

through

G.S. 122C-283

pertaining to initial (first-level) examinations by a physician or eligible psychologist of individuals meeting the criteria of

G.S. 122C-261

(a) or

G.S. 122C-281

(a), as applicable, as follows:

“(1) The Secretary has received a request from an LME to substitute for a physician or eligible psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a masters level psychiatric nurse, or a masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist to conduct the initial (first-level) examinations of individuals meeting the criteria of

G.S. 122C-261(a)

or
G.S. 122C-281(a). The waiver shall be implemented on a pilot-program basis. The request from the LME shall specifically describe:

“a. How the purpose of the statutory requirement would be better served by waiving the requirement and substituting the proposed change under the waiver.

“b. How the waiver will enable the LME to improve the delivery or management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

“c. How the services to be provided by the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist under the waiver are within each of these professional’s scope of practice.

“d. How the health, safety, and welfare of individuals will continue to be at least as well protected under the waiver as under the statutory requirement.

“(2) The Secretary shall review the request and may approve it upon finding that:

“a. The request meets the requirements of this section.

“b. The request furthers the purposes of State policy under

G.S. 122C-2

and mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services reform.

“c. The request improves the delivery of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in the counties affected by the waiver and also protects the health, safety, and welfare of individuals receiving these services.

“d. The duties and responsibilities performed by the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist are within the individual’s scope of practice.

“(3) The Secretary shall evaluate the effectiveness, quality, and efficiency of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services and protection of health, safety, and welfare under the waiver. The Secretary shall send a report on the evaluation to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substances Abuse Services by October 1, 2009. The report shall include data gathered from all participating LMEs since the beginning of the pilot.

“(4) The waiver granted by the Secretary under this section shall be in effect until October 1, 2012.

“(5) The Secretary may grant a waiver under this section to up to 20 LMEs.

“(6) In no event shall the substitution of a licensed clinical social worker, masters level psychiatric nurse, or masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist under a waiver granted under this section be construed as authorization to expand the scope of practice of the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist.

“(7) The Department shall assure that staff performing the duties are trained and privileged to perform the functions identified in the waiver. The Department shall involve stakeholders including, but not limited to, the North Carolina Psychiatric Association, The North Carolina Nurses Association, National Association of Social Workers, The North Carolina Substance Abuse Professional Practice Board, North Carolina Psychological Association, The North Carolina Society for Clinical Social Work, and the North Carolina Medical Society in developing required staff competencies.

“(8) The LME shall assure that a physician is available at all times to provide backup support to include telephone consultation and face-to-face evaluation, if necessary.”

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2006’.”

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 28.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2006-2007 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2006-2007 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 28.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2007-504, s. 1.1(b), provides: “The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (LOC) shall review the report submitted by the Secretary under Section 1.1.(a) of this act. The LOC shall make recommendations to the 2010 Regular Session of the 2009 General Assembly regarding whether to extend the pilot, discontinue the pilot, or make the provisions of the pilot permanent and statewide.”

Session Laws
2018-33, s. 46, made the amendment of this section by Session Laws
2018-33, s. 32, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to proceedings initiated on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-23, s. 1(b), effective June 25, 2004, added the last sentence in subsection (e).

Session Laws 2018-33, s. 32, rewrote the section. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1097 (1981).